Alabama, session 2026rs, HB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The amount of an in-person cash
transaction may be rounded to the nearest five cents using the
following methodology:
(1) If the final digit of the amount in the transaction
is one or two, the final digit must be rounded down to zero.
(2) If the final digit is three or four, the final
digit must be rounded up to five.
(3) If the final digit is six or seven, the final digit
must be rounded down to five.
(4) If the final digit is eight or nine, the final
digit must be rounded up to zero.
(5) If the final digit is five or zero, the final digit
must not be rounded.
(b) Subsection (a) does not alter the sales price, the
amount of tax collected under Section 40-23-26, Code of
Alabama 1975, or any other authority providing for the
collection of sales tax, or any surcharges, assessments, or
fees imposed on the sale.
(c)(1) Subsection (a) may apply to the amount of the
transaction or to the amount of change tendered to the
purchaser.
(2) Subsection (a) shall not apply to any transaction
Page 1

(2) Subsection (a) shall not apply to any transaction
HB545 Enrolled
for which payment is made by a method other than cash,
including electronic funds transfer, check, gift card, money
order, or credit card. If the transaction is made using both
cash and another form of payment, subsection (a) shall apply
to the portion of the transaction amount that is paid for
using cash.
(3) Subsection (a) shall not alter or affect any
payment amount authorized, cleared, or settled through any
payment system that does not use cash.
(4) Subsection (a) shall not apply to any transaction
where payment is made to a governmental entity. For purposes
of this subdivision, "governmental entity" means any state or
local agency or instrumentality thereof located in the state.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall post a notice on
the department's website stating the authorization to begin
rounding transactions pursuant to this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB545 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Amended and Passed

House Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3